src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-tellen_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
# Orthographic variation in consonant length


  Verb - tellen: # Verb 'to count' - full paradigm
     tellen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: telle
     tellen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: telst
     tellen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: telt
     tellen+V+Ind+Prs+Pl: [tellet, tellen]

     tellen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: telde
     tellen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: teldest
     tellen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: telde
     tellen+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: telden

     tellen+V+Inf:  tellen
     tellen+V+PrfPrc:  teld
     tellen+V+PrsPrc:  tellen

     tellen+V+Imprt+Sg2:  tel
     tellen+V+Imprt+Pl2:  tellet
